Vermont, session 2025-2026, H49.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. ELECTRONIC ROLL-CALL SYSTEM; VERMONT HOUSE
(a) On or before June 15, 2025, the Joint Fiscal Office (JFO), in
consultation with the Office of Legislative Counsel, the Office of Legislative
Information Technology, and the Office of the Clerk of the House, shall issue a
request for proposal (RFP) to install and implement an electronic roll-call
system for the Vermont House of Representatives. The RFP shall require the
vendor to install the electronic roll-call system by the start of the 2026
legislative session.
VT LEG #379011 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.49
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) On or before August 15, 2025, the JFO shall enter into a contract with a
vendor based on the bids received from the RFP described in subsection (a) of
this section.
(c) The JFO shall be appropriated funding from the FY26 Capital
Construction Act to enter into the contract described in subsection (b) of this
section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379011 v.1